Montana, session 2025, HB481.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Disclosure of federal guidance documents. (1) Within 15 days after
the receipt of a guidance document from the United States environmental protection agency, the department of
environmental quality shall publish the guidance document on a website designated by the department.
(2) Within 90 days after [the effective date of this act], the director shall designate a website on
which guidance documents must be published. The department shall publish a conspicuous hyperlink on the
department website providing access to the website of guidance documents.
(3) Within 15 days after the United States environmental protection agency rescinds a guidance
document, the department shall maintain the rescinded document on the guidance documents website. The
department shall indicate that the document has been rescinded and the date the guidance document was
rescinded.
(4) Except for a rule that was promulgated in accordance with the notice and comment provisions
of 5 U.S.C. 553, a "guidance document" means a federal agency statement of general applicability that is
designated by a federal agency official as setting forth a policy or interpretation on a statutory, regulatory, or
technical issue. This includes but is not limited to a memorandum, notice, bulletin, directive, news release,
letter, blog post, or no-action letter.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Disclosure of federal guidance documents. (1) Within 15 days after
the receipt of a guidance document from the United States environmental protection agency, the department
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 481

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 481.1
shall publish the guidance document on a website designated by the department.
(2) Within 90 days after [the effective date of this act], the director shall designate a website on
which guidance documents must be published. The department shall publish a conspicuous hyperlink on the
department website providing access to the website of guidance documents.
(3) Within 15 days after the United States environmental protection agency rescinds a guidance
document, the department shall maintain the rescinded document on the guidance documents website. The
department shall indicate that the document has been rescinded and the date the guidance document was
rescinded.
(4) Except for a rule that was promulgated in accordance with the notice and comment provisions
of 5 U.S.C. 553, a "guidance document" means a federal agency statement of general applicability that is
designated by a federal agency official as setting forth a policy or interpretation on a statutory, regulatory, or
technical issue. This includes but is not limited to a memorandum, notice, bulletin, directive, news release,
letter, blog post, or no-action letter.

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Disclosure of federal guidance documents. (1) Within 15 days after
the receipt of a guidance document from the United States environmental protection agency, the board shall
publish the guidance document on a website designated by the board.
(2) Within 90 days after [the effective date of this act], the administrator shall designate a website
on which guidance documents must be published. The board shall publish a conspicuous hyperlink on the
board website providing access to the website of guidance documents.
(3) Within 15 days after the United States environmental protection agency rescinds a guidance
document, the board shall maintain the rescinded document on the guidance documents website. The board
shall indicate that the document has been rescinded and the date the guidance document was rescinded.
(4) Except for a rule that was promulgated in accordance with the notice and comment provisions
of 5 U.S.C. 553, a "guidance document" means a federal agency statement of general applicability that is
designated by a federal agency official as setting forth a policy or interpretation on a statutory, regulatory, or
technical issue. This includes but is not limited to a memorandum, notice, bulletin, directive, news release,
letter, blog post, or no-action letter.
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 481

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 481.1

NEW SECTION. Section 4. Codification instruction. (1) [Section 1] is intended to be codified as
an integral part of Title 75, chapter 1, part 1, and the provisions of Title 75, chapter 1, part 1, apply to [section
1].
(2) [Section 2] is intended to be codified as an integral part of Title 80, chapter 1, part 1, and the
provisions of Title 80, chapter 1, part 1, apply to [section 2].
(3) [Section 3] is intended to be codified as an integral part of Title 82, chapter 11, part 1, and the
provisions of Title 82, chapter 11, part 1 apply to [section 3].
- END -
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 481